static/hunspell/29.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX N13 0 ындағыларҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыларҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыларҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағыларсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыларсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағыларсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыларсы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыларсы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағының [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX N13 0 ыңдағының [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX N13 0 ындағының [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағының [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағының [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX N13 0 ымдағыға [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыға [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX N13 0 ындағыға [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыға [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыға [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX N13 0 ымдағыны [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыны [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX N13 0 ындағыны [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыны [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыны [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX N13 0 ымдағынан [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынан [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX N13 0 ындағынан [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынан [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынан [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX N13 0 ымдағыла [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыла [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX N13 0 ындағыла [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыла [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыла [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX N13 0 ымдағыныңмы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыныңмы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағыныңмы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыныңмы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыныңмы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағығамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағығамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағығамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағығамы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағығамы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағынымы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынымы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағынымы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынымы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынымы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағынанмы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынанмы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағынанмы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынанмы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынанмы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағыламы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыламы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағыламы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыламы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыламы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағыныңдыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыныңдыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағыныңдыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыныңдыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыныңдыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағығалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағығалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағығалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағығалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағығалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағынылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағынылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағынандыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынандыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағынандыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынандыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынандыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағылалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағылалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағылалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағылалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағылалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағыныңсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыныңсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағыныңсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыныңсы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыныңсы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағығасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағығасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағығасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағығасы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағығасы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағынысы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынысы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағынысы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынысы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынысы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағынансы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағынансы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағынансы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағынансы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағынансы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағыласы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыласы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағыласы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыласы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыласы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағымы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағымы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағымы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағымы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағымы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағылыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағысы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағысы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағысы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағысы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағысы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағылай [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N13 0 ыңдағылай [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N13 0 ындағылай [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағылай [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағылай [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N13 0 ымдағыса [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N13 0 ыңдағыса [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N13 0 ындағыса [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағыса [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағыса [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N13 0 ымдағылаймы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағылаймы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағылаймы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағылаймы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағылаймы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағысамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңдағысамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N13 0 ындағысамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағысамы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағысамы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N13 0 ымдағылайҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағылайҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағылайҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағылайҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағылайҙыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағысалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңдағысалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N13 0 ындағысалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағысалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағысалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымдағылайсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағылайсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағылайсы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағылайсы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағылайсы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымдағысасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңдағысасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ындағысасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙҙағысасы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙҙағысасы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ымаса [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX N13 0 ыңаса [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX N13 0 ынаса [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙғаса [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX N13 0 ығыҙғаса [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX N13 0 ымасамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N13 0 ыңасамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N13 0 ынасамы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙғасамы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N13 0 ығыҙғасамы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N13 0 ымасалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыңасалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N13 0 ынасалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙғасалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N13 0 ығыҙғасалыр [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N13 0 ымасасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыңасасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ынасасы [^пкҡь]	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ыбыҙғасасы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N13 0 ығыҙғасасы [^пкҡь]	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N13 ь ымдың [ь]	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX N13 ь ыңдың [ь]	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX N13 ь ының [ь]	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙың [ь]	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙың [ь]	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX N13 ь ыма [ь]	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX N13 ь ыңа [ь]	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX N13 ь ына [ь]	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙға [ь]	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX N13 ь ығыҙға [ь]	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX N13 ь ымды [ь]	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX N13 ь ыңды [ь]	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX N13 ь ын [ь]	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙы [ь]	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙы [ь]	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX N13 ь ымдан [ь]	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX N13 ь ыңдан [ь]	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX N13 ь ынан [ь]	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙан [ь]	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙан [ь]	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX N13 ь ымда [ь]	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX N13 ь ыңда [ь]	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX N13 ь ында [ь]	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙа [ь]	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙа [ь]	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX N13 ь ымдыңмы [ь]	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX N13 ь ыңдыңмы [ь]	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX N13 ь ыныңмы [ь]	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙыңмы [ь]	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙыңмы [ь]	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX N13 ь ымамы [ь]	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX N13 ь ыңамы [ь]	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX N13 ь ынамы [ь]	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙғамы [ь]	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX N13 ь ығыҙғамы [ь]	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX N13 ь ымдымы [ь]	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX N13 ь ыңдымы [ь]	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX N13 ь ынмы [ь]	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙымы [ь]	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙымы [ь]	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX N13 ь ымданмы [ь]	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX N13 ь ыңданмы [ь]	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX N13 ь ынанмы [ь]	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙанмы [ь]	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙанмы [ь]	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX N13 ь ымдамы [ь]	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX N13 ь ыңдамы [ь]	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX N13 ь ындамы [ь]	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙамы [ь]	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙамы [ь]	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX N13 ь ымдыңмылыр [ь]	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыңдыңмылыр [ь]	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыныңмылыр [ь]	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙыңмылыр [ь]	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ығыҙҙыңмылыр [ь]	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ымамылыр [ь]	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыңамылыр [ь]	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ынамылыр [ь]	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙғамылыр [ь]	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ығыҙғамылыр [ь]	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ымдымылыр [ь]	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыңдымылыр [ь]	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ынмылыр [ь]	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX N13 ь ыбыҙҙымылыр [ь]	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
